Hawaii statutes.
§383-97 Change of rates. Whenever the
department of labor and industrial relations believes that a change in
contribution or benefit rates will become necessary to protect the solvency of
the fund, it shall promptly so inform the governor and the legislature, and
make recommendations with respect thereto. [L 1941, c 304, §1, pt of subs 32;
RL 1945, §4276; RL 1955, §93-96; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §27; HRS §383-97]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next